District of Columbia statutes.
40-205

Recorder to provide lien docket.

The Recorder of Deeds of the District of Columbia shall provide a suitable bound book to be called the hospital lien docket, in which, upon the filing of any lien claim under the provisions of this chapter, he shall enter the name of the injured person, the name of the person, firm, or corporation alleged to be liable for the injuries, the date of the accident, and the name of the hospital or other institution or agency making the claim. The Recorder of Deeds shall index the same in the name of the injured person and shall charge and collect a fee of $1 for recording, indexing, and releasing the lien so filed.

June 30, 1939, 53 Stat. 991, ch. 255, § 5
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 991, ch. 646, § 32(b)
June 19, 1948, 62 Stat. 496, ch. 525, § 4
May 24, 1949, 63 Stat. 107, ch. 139, § 127
July 5, 1966, 80 Stat. 265, Pub. L. 89-493, § 16
1981 Ed., § 38-305.
1973 Ed., § 38-305.